Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-805
Claims; disallowance; notice.

Upon the rejection or disallowance of any claim, it shall be the duty of the city clerk to notify the claimant or his agent or attorney of such fact, unless such notice is waived in writing. Such notice may be served by any person authorized by the city clerk and must be served within ten days from the rejection of such claim. The notice and return thereon must be filed with the comptroller.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. VII, § 5, p. 510;

C.S.1922, § 3713;

C.S.1929, § 14-805;

R.S.1943, § 14-805.